Utah statutes.
32A-13-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Searches, seizures, and forfeitures.
(1)  The following are subject to forfeiture pursuant to the procedures and
substantive protections established in Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform
Forfeiture Procedures Act:
(a)  all alcoholic products possessed, used, offered for sale, sold, given,
furnished, supplied, received, purchased, stored, warehoused, manufactured,
adulterated, shipped, carried, transported, or distributed in violation of
this title or commission rules;
(b)  all packages or property used or intended for use as a container for an
alcoholic product in violation of this title or commission rules;
(c)  all raw materials, products, and equipment used, or intended for use, in
manufacturing, processing, adulterating, delivering, importing, or exporting
any alcoholic product in violation of this title or commission rules;
(d)  all implements, furniture, fixtures, or other personal property used or
kept for any violation of this title or commission rules;
(e)  all conveyances including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels used or intended
for use, to transport or in any manner facilitate the transportation, sale,
receipt, possession, or concealment of property described in Subsection
(1)(a), (b), (c), or (d); and
(f)  all books, records, receipts, ledgers, or other documents used or
intended for use in violation of this title or commission rules.
(2)  Any of the property subject to forfeiture under this title may be seized
by any peace officer of this state or any other person authorized by law upon
process issued by any court having jurisdiction over the property in
accordance with the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to search
warrants or administrative warrants.  However, seizure without process may be
made when:
(a)  the seizure is incident to an arrest or search under a search warrant or
an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(b)  the property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment
in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding under
this title;
(c)  the peace officer or other person authorized by law has probable cause to
believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or
safety; or
(d)  the peace officer or other person authorized by law has probable cause to
believe that the property is being or has been used, intended to be used,
held, or kept in violation of this title or commission rules.
(3)  If the property is seized pursuant to a search or administrative warrant,
the peace officer or other person authorized by law shall comply with the
requirements of the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(4)  In the event of seizure of property without process, the peace officer or
other person authorized by law shall make a return of his acts without delay
directly to the district court of the county in which the property was
located, and the district court shall have jurisdiction of the case.  The
return shall describe all property seized, the place where it was seized, and
any persons in apparent possession of the property. The officer or other
person shall also promptly deliver a written inventory of anything seized to
any person in apparent authority at the premises where the seizure was made,
or post it in a conspicuous place at the premises.  The inventory shall state
the place where the property is being held.
(5)  Property taken or detained under this section is not repleviable but is
considered in custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure subject
only to the orders of the court or the official having jurisdiction.  When
property is seized under this title, the appropriate person or agency may:
(a)  place the property under seal;
(b)  remove the property to a place designated by it or the warrant under
which it was seized; or
(c)  take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for
disposition in accordance with law.
(6)  When any property is subject to forfeiture under this section,
proceedings shall be instituted in accordance with the procedures and
substantive protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture
Procedures Act.
(7)  When any property is ordered forfeited under Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah
Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act, by a finding of the court that no person is
entitled to recover the property, the property, if an alcoholic product or a
package used as a container for an alcoholic product, shall be disposed of as
follows:
(a)  If the alcoholic product is unadulterated, pure, and free from crude,
unrectified, or impure form of ethylic alcohol, or any other deleterious
substance or liquid, and is otherwise in saleable condition, it shall be sold
in accordance with Section 24-1-17.
(b)  If the alcoholic product is impure, adulterated, or otherwise unfit for
sale, it and its package or container shall be destroyed by the department
under competent supervision.
